Rhode Island, session 2025, SB983.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-28 of the General Laws entitled "State Police" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
42-28-3.7. PURPLE alert.
(a) This section establishes the PURPLE alert program to immediately alert the community
about a missing adult with a serious or substantial physical, behavioral health, neurological
disability, or condition that objectively establishes concerns for the immediate safety and wellbeing
of the missing person.
(b) The division of state police, in consultation with the Rhode Island emergency
management agency (RIEMA) and other appropriate agencies shall develop and institute the
PURPLE alert program. The PURPLE alert program shall establish a voluntary partnership among
law enforcement agencies, media outlets and other appropriate entities to send out emergency alerts
designed to expediently assist in locating a PURPLE alert citizen by utilizing available resources
including the Integrated Public Alert and Warning System (IPAWS).
(c) For purposes of §§ 42-28-3.7 and 42-28-3.8, a “PURPLE alert citizen” means a person:
(1) Whose whereabouts are unknown;
(2) Whose domicile at the time the person is reported missing is Rhode Island;
(3) Whose age at the time the person is reported missing is eighteen (18) years of age or
older;
(4) Who has a serious or substantial physical, behavioral health, neurological disability, or

condition that objectively establishes concerns for the immediate safety and wellbeing of the
missing person; and
(5) Whose disappearance poses a credible threat to the safety and health of such person, as
determined by the state police or other law enforcement agency.
(d) The serious physical, behavioral health, or neurological disability or condition shall be
demonstrated by appropriate documentation presented by the missing person’s family, legal
guardian, long-term care ombudsman, or long-term care facility where such person resides.
Provided, however, that any medical or personal information provided pursuant to this section shall
be kept strictly confidential and not subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 2 of title 36 ("access
to public records").
(e) If a law enforcement agency has confirmed the disappearance of a missing adult with
the above disability or conditions, the law enforcement agency shall immediately obtain descriptive
information for the PURPLE alert, contact the state police to provide the descriptive information
and identify a point of contact within its agency.
(f) The PURPLE alert program shall provide a proactive emergency public alert plan,
including, where appropriate, access and use of IPAWS as part of the response to the disappearance
of a missing adult with a serious physical, behavioral health, neurological disability or condition.
This program shall be capable of being expediently triggered by law enforcement personnel in
accordance with protocols, procedures, and rules established by the division of state police in
consultation with appropriate law enforcement authorities, the Rhode Island emergency
management agency, the department of health, state and local officials and cooperating members
of the broadcast media (“PURPLE alert”).
42-28-3.8. PURPLE alert procedures for protocol and implementation.
(a) The division of state police in consultation with the Rhode Island emergency
management agency (RIEMA) shall establish protocols, procedures, and rules to implement a
PURPLE alert. The protocols, procedures, and rules shall be updated as may be necessary in
consultation with the entities and agencies involved in the PURPLE alert process to provide
effective and efficient procedures to assist law enforcement agencies, broadcast media and other
cooperating agencies or entities in providing an emergency alert to the public in response to a
missing adult with a serious physical, behavioral health, neurological disability or condition.
(b) The Rhode Island emergency management agency ("RIEMA") shall, no later than
January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter review the policies and procedures implemented and
conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section. The review shall involve all agencies
that participate in IPAWS.
LC002713/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(c) RIEMA shall conduct and keep records for annual training to be provided for all
participating agencies utilizing the IPAWS system. Training pursuant to this subsection shall be
mandatory for all personnel employed and involved in conducting IPAWS Purple Alert operations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002713/SUB A
========
LC002713/SUB A - Page 3 of 4